dictionaries/ca-valencia/index.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: reeixir
SFX 81 Y 98
SFX 81 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 81 r nt/_C ir
SFX 81 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 81 r da/_Y ir
SFX 81 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 81 r des/_Y ir
SFX 81 eixir ïxo/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsc/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïxes/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïx/_Z ir
SFX 81 r m/_Z ir
SFX 81 r u/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïxen/_Z ir
SFX 81 r a/_Z ir
SFX 81 r es/_Z ir
SFX 81 r a/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 81 r en/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquí/_Z ir
SFX 81 r res/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsqueres/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsqué/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquérem/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquéreu/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsqueren/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 81 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 81 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 81 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 81 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsca/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsqui/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïxi/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsques/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquis/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïxis/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsca/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsqui/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïxi/_Z ir
SFX 81 r m/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquem/_Z ir
SFX 81 r u/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsqueu/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquen/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquin/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïxin/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsqués/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquera/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquessis/_Z ir
SFX 81 r res/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsqueres/_Z ir
SFX 81 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquesses/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsqués/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquera/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquéssim/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquérem/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquéssem/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquéssiu/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquéreu/_Z ir
SFX 81 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquésseu/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquessin/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsqueren/_Z ir
SFX 81 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquessen/_Z ir
SFX 81 eixir ïx/_C ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsca/_D ir
SFX 81 eixir ïxi/_D ir
SFX 81 r m/_C ir
SFX 81 r u/_C ir
SFX 81 eixir ïsquen/_C ir
SFX 81 eixir ïxin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: renyir
SFX 82 Y 101
SFX 82 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 82 r nt/_C ir
SFX 82 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 82 r da/_Y ir
SFX 82 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 82 r des/_Y ir
SFX 82 ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 82 r sc/_Z ir
SFX 82 enyir iny/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 82 r xes/_Z ir
SFX 82 enyir inys/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 82 r x/_Z ir
SFX 82 enyir iny/_Z ir
SFX 82 r m/_Z ir
SFX 82 r u/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 82 r xen/_Z ir
SFX 82 enyir inyen/_Z ir
SFX 82 r a/_Z ir
SFX 82 r es/_Z ir
SFX 82 r a/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 82 r en/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 82 r res/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 82 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 82 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 82 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 82 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 82 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 82 enyir inya/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 82 r sques/_Z ir
SFX 82 enyir inyes/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 82 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 82 enyir inya/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 82 r m/_Z ir
SFX 82 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 82 r u/_Z ir
SFX 82 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 82 r squen/_Z ir
SFX 82 enyir inyen/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 82 r res/_Z ir
SFX 82 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir eix/_C ir
SFX 82 r x/_C ir
SFX 82 enyir iny/_C ir
SFX 82 ir esca/_D ir
SFX 82 r sca/_D ir
SFX 82 enyir inya/_D ir
SFX 82 ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 82 ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 82 r m/_C ir
SFX 82 r guem/_C ir
SFX 82 r u/_C ir
SFX 82 ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 82 r squen/_C ir
SFX 82 enyir inyen/_C ir
SFX 82 ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 82 ir eixin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: revendre
SFX 83 Y 71
SFX 83 e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 83 dre ent/_C re
SFX 83 dre ut/_v_Y re
SFX 83 dre uda/_Y re
SFX 83 dre uts/_Y re
SFX 83 dre udes/_Y re
SFX 83 dre c/_Z re
SFX 83 dre s/_Z re
SFX 83 endre èn/_Z re
SFX 83 endre én/_Z re
SFX 83 dre em/_Z re
SFX 83 dre eu/_Z re
SFX 83 dre en/_Z re
SFX 83 dre ia/_Z re
SFX 83 dre ies/_Z re
SFX 83 dre ia/_Z re
SFX 83 dre íem/_Z re
SFX 83 dre íeu/_Z re
SFX 83 dre ien/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guí/_Z re
SFX 83 dre gueres/_Z re
SFX 83 dre gué/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guérem/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guéreu/_Z re
SFX 83 dre gueren/_Z re
SFX 83 e é/_Z re
SFX 83 e às/_Z re
SFX 83 e à/_Z re
SFX 83 e em/_Z re
SFX 83 e eu/_Z re
SFX 83 e an/_Z re
SFX 83 e ia/_Z re
SFX 83 e ies/_Z re
SFX 83 e ia/_Z re
SFX 83 e íem/_Z re
SFX 83 e íeu/_Z re
SFX 83 e ien/_Z re
SFX 83 dre ga/_Z re
SFX 83 dre gui/_Z re
SFX 83 dre gues/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guis/_Z re
SFX 83 dre ga/_Z re
SFX 83 dre gui/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guem/_Z re
SFX 83 dre gueu/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guen/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guin/_Z re
SFX 83 dre gués/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guera/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guessis/_Z re
SFX 83 dre gueres/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guesses/_Z re
SFX 83 dre gués/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guera/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guéssim/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guérem/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guéssem/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guéssiu/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guéreu/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guésseu/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guessin/_Z re
SFX 83 dre gueren/_Z re
SFX 83 dre guessen/_Z re
SFX 83 endre èn/_C re
SFX 83 endre én/_C re
SFX 83 dre ga/_D re
SFX 83 dre gui/_D re
SFX 83 dre guem/_C re
SFX 83 dre eu/_C re
SFX 83 dre guen/_C re
SFX 83 dre guin/_C re
